Arkansas, session 2025, SB424.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 14, Chapter 88, Subchapter 5, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
14-88-506. Public comment required.
A municipal improvement district board shall allow public comment on
any item on the agenda for a special meeting or regular meeting before action
is taken by the municipal improvement district board.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 14-89-1501(a), concerning quarterly
financial reports for municipal improvement districts, is amended to read as
follows:
(a)(1) All improvement districts in any city or incorporated town in
this state established for the purpose of making improvements for municipal
purposes shall meet at least four (4) times per year or quarterly in each
quarter of the calendar year.
(2)(A) Notice of each meeting, including without limitation each
quarterly meeting under this section, shall be given by the municipal
*SSS249*
03/11/2025 12:12:14 PM SSS249

SB424
improvement district to all record owners of property in the municipal
improvement district no more than thirty (30) days before the meeting date
and no less than ten (10) days before the meeting date.
(B) The municipal improvement district board shall provide
the agenda for each meeting to the record owners of the property in the
municipal improvement district with the notice required under subdivision
(a)(2)(A) of this section.





























03/11/2025 12:12:14 PM SSS249